District of Columbia statutes.
7-2871.04

Materials development and distribution.

(a)

The Department of Health shall create educational materials on the nature and risk of concussions.

(b)

Before an athlete may participate in an athletic activity, the organizing entity shall provide the educational materials developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the athlete and the parent or guardian of the athlete. The athlete and the parent or guardian of the athlete shall sign a statement acknowledging receipt of the materials and return it to the organizing entity before the athlete shall be allowed to participate in the athletic activity.

History

Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-22, § 5, 58 DCR 6506